src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VINIT_INDEP_aakozi_gt-norm.yaml
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozimwgobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozimwgobanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: niaakoziwdigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: niaakoziwdigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: niaakoziwbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: niaakoziwbanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakoziwgobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakoziwgobanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: niaakozimdigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozimdigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: niaakozimbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozimbanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozimgobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozimgobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: giaakozimindigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozimindigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: giaakoziminbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giaakoziminbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozimingobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozimingobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: giaakozimwdigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozimwdigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: giaakozimwbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozimwbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozimwgobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozimwgobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: giaakoziwdigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: giaakoziwdigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: giaakoziwbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: giaakoziwbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakoziwgobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakoziwgobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: giaakozimdigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozimdigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: giaakozimbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozimbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozimgobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: aakozisiimindigan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiimindigag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: aakozisiiminbanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: aakozisiiminbanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozisiimingobanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiimingobanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: aakozisiimwdigan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiimwdigag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: aakozisiimwbanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: aakozisiimwbanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozisiimwgobanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiimwgobanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: aakozisiiwdigan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiiwdigag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: aakozisiiwbanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: aakozisiiwbanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozisiiwgobanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiiwgobanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: aakozisiimdigan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiimdigag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: aakozisiimbanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: aakozisiimbanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozisiimgobanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiimindigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiimindigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niaakozisiiminbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozisiiminbanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiimingobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiimingobanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiimwdigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiimwdigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niaakozisiimwbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozisiimwbanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiimwgobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiimwgobanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiiwdigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiiwdigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: niaakozisiiwbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozisiiwbanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiiwgobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiiwgobanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiimdigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiimdigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: niaakozisiimbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozisiimbanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiimgobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiimgobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiimindigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiimindigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: giaakozisiiminbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozisiiminbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiimingobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiimingobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiimwdigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiimwdigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: giaakozisiimwbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozisiimwbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiimwgobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiimwgobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiiwdigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiiwdigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: giaakozisiiwbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozisiiwbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiiwgobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiiwgobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiimdigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiimdigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: giaakozisiimbanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozisiimbanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiimgobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiimgobanag
     
